Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.460

Employees' group insurance—False arrest insurance.

Subject to chapter 48.62 RCW, any second-class city or town may contract with an insurance company authorized to do business in this state to provide group insurance for its employees including group false arrest insurance for its law enforcement personnel, and pursuant thereto may use a portion of its revenues to pay an employer's portion of the premium for such insurance, and may make deductions from the payrolls of employees for the amount of the employees' contribution and may apply the amount deducted in payment of the employees' portion of the premium.

[ 1994 c 81 s 21; 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 19; 1965 c 7 s 35.23.460. Prior: 1963 c 127 s 1; 1947 c 162 s 1; RRS s 9592-160.]

NOTES:

Effective date, implementation, application—1991 sp.s. c 30: See RCW 48.62.900.